Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Residential Energy Conservation Fund.

Administrative Code. —

For residential energy conservation loans, see 3 AAC 79.

Sec. 45.88.100.
Fund established.

There is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development the residential energy conservation fund to carry out the purposes of AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

. Loans and grants made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

may be used to purchase, construct, and install an energy conservation improvement in residential buildings.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

.

On June 30 of each fiscal year the unexpended and unobligated cash balance of the fund that is attributable to loans owned by the fund lapses into the general fund.

History.

(§ 35 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 79 SLA 1983; am §§ 77, 78 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.89.010

.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.88.110.
Special account established.

There is established as a special account within the residential energy conservation fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The commissioner may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

45.88.120

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 25 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.89.015.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.120

”
was substituted for “AS

45.89.030

”.

Sec. 45.88.120.
Loans.

The department may make loans for the purchase, construction, and installation of an energy conservation improvement in a residential building.

A loan for the purchase, construction, and installation of an energy conservation improvement under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

may not exceed the lesser of

an amount, as determined by an energy audit, that is equal to the estimated total energy cost saving attributable to the energy conservation improvement at a date that is 10 years after purchase, construction, or installation of the energy conservation improvement;

$5,000.

A loan for the purchase, construction, and installation of an energy conservation improvement under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

may be made for only an energy conservation improvement that has been recommended, in any energy audit, as a measure that is likely to result in energy conservation or energy cost savings.

A loan made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

may be used to finance

all of the cost of purchasing, constructing, and installing an energy conservation improvement; and

the costs of labor for the installation of an energy conservation improvement.

Interest shall be charged on a loan made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

. If a loan is made before January 1, 1984, interest shall be five percent. If the loan is made after December 31, 1983, interest shall equal the percentage of the average weekly yield of municipal bonds for the 12 months preceding the loan, as determined by the commissioner from the municipal bond yield rates reported in the 30-year revenue index of the Weekly Bond Buyer.

The duration of repayment of a loan made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

may not exceed 10 years.

The department may require security for a loan under this section. When a loan is made under this section, the department may require the loan applicant to present copies of invoices or billings for expenses which the proceeds of the loan will be used to pay.

All principal and interest payments, and money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on a loan made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

, shall be paid into the residential energy conservation fund.

A person who receives a loan under this section and knowingly uses the loan proceeds for purposes other than those set out in (d) of this section is guilty of the crime of misapplication of property under AS

11.46.620

.

If, in the opinion of the department, it is not necessary to conduct an energy audit to determine that a loan application meets the requirements of this section, the department may waive the audit requirement for the applicant.

The department may not make a loan under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

History.

(§ 35 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 61 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 116 SLA 1986; am § 79 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.89.030

.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to “child support services agency” in (k) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 45.88.130.
Sale or transfer of mortgages and notes.

The commissioner may sell or transfer at par value or at a premium or discount to any bank or other private purchaser for cash or other consideration the mortgages and notes held by the department as security for loans made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 83 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.89.040.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 45.88.140.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

. Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 26 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.89.050.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 45.88.150.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided and charges for collecting the fees.

The department may collect the fees and collection charges established under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 26 ch 79 SLA 1985; am §§ 80, 81 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.89.070.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 45.88.190.
Definitions.

In AS

45.88.010

—

45.88.190

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“energy audit” means

[Repealed, § 10 ch 79 SLA 1983.]

an energy audit performed under § 215(b)(1)(A) of the federal residential energy conservation program of the National Energy Conservation Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 8216(b)(1)(A)); or

an energy audit completed before July 1, 1980, that has been approved by the commissioner as an audit that fairly demonstrates the energy consumption characteristics of a residence and that indicates likely energy conservation and cost savings measures;

“energy conservation improvement” means

structural insulation;

thermal windows and doors;

a furnace replacement burner designed to achieve a reduction in the amount of fuel consumed as a result of increased combustion efficiency;

a device for modifying flue openings designed to increase the efficiency of operation of the heating system;

an electrical or mechanical furnace ignition system which replaces a gas pilot light;

an automatic energy-saving setback thermostat;

a meter which displays the cost of energy usage;

caulking and weatherstripping of doors and windows;

insulating shades and shutters;

air and water recuperators;

any other energy-saving device approved by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 35 ch 83 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 79 SLA 1983; am § 67 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as
AS 45.89.100 and renumbered as
AS 45.89.500 in 1980.
Renumbered again in 2006, at which time “
AS

45.88.100

—

45.88.190

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

Subparagraph (3)(B) of this section refers to 50 U.S.C. App 453 which was renumbered in 2015 as 50 U.S.C. 3802 by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Subparagraph (3)(B) refers to 42 U.S.C. 8216(b)(1)(A). The program provided for under 42 U.S.C. 8216(b)(1)(A) was terminated on June 30, 1989 under
42 U.S.C. 8229. 42 U.S.C. 8216(b)was then omitted from the United States Code.

Sec. 45.88.500.
[Subsection (a) renumbered as AS 45.88.090; subsection (b) renumbered as AS 45.88.010(d).]